Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-134
Obstructing drainage ditch; penalty.

Any person or persons or association of any kind or any corporation, who shall either for himself or for another deposit within the banks, limits or right-of-way of any drain or ditch, that has been, or shall hereafter be constructed under the terms and provisions of sections 31-101 to 31-138, or within the banks of watercourses or draws, or within any road ditches along any public highways that lead or empty into such drains or ditches, any brush, trees, hay, straw, manure or any other debris, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall be fined in any sum not less than ten dollars nor more than fifty dollars, and shall moreover be liable in damages to any party injured.

Laws 1881, c. 51, § 27, p. 246;

Laws 1905, c. 159, § 1, p. 608;

Laws 1909, c. 142, § 1, p. 500;

Laws 1911, c. 140, § 27, p. 464;

R.S.1913, § 1751;

C.S.1922, § 1698;

C.S.1929, § 31-134;

R.S.1943, § 31-134.